Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-4911
Company workplace safety program, defined.

Company workplace safety program means any program developed by or operated by or for the benefit of the workplace safety of employees employed at the project.

Laws 1995, LB 829, § 11.